North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 49G. Production and Sale of Pen-Raised Quail.

§ 106-549.94.
Regulation of pen-raised quail by Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services; certain authority of North Carolina Wildlife Resources Commission not affected.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services is given exclusive authority to regulate the production and sale of pen-raised quail for food purposes. The Board of Agriculture shall promulgate rules and regulations for the production and sale of pen-raised quail for food purposes in such a manner as to provide for close supervision of any person, firm, or corporation producing and selling pen-raised quail for food purposes.

The North Carolina Wildlife Resources Commission shall retain its authority to regulate the possession and transportation of live pen-raised quail.

History.

1971, c. 515, ss. 1-4; c. 1114; 1973, c. 1262, s. 18; 1977, c. 905, ss. 1, 2; 1979, c. 830, s. 15; 1997-261, ss. 63, 109.

§§ 106-549.95,
106-549.96.

Reserved for future codification purposes.